Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-211 Ocean marine insurance defined.
Ocean marine insurance (although not a class of insurance as named in section
431:1-203), whenever the term is used in this code, means insurance:

(1) Upon vessels, crafts, hulls, and of interests
therein, or with relation thereto;

(2) Of marine builders' risks, marine war risks and
contracts of marine protection and indemnity insurance;

(3) Of freights and disbursements pertaining to a
subject of insurance coming within this definition;

(4) Of personal property and interests therein, in
course of movement into or out of this State or among the islands of this
State, or in course of exportation from or importation into any country, or in
course of transportation coastwise, including transportation by land, water, or
air from point of origin to final destination, in respect to, appertaining to,
or in connection with, any risk or peril of navigation, transit or
transportation, and while being prepared for and while awaiting shipment, and
during any delays, storage, transshipment, or reshipment incident thereto. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next